Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.235

Reading skills—Intensive reading and literacy improvement strategy—Calculation of tested students at or below basic on third grade student assessment—State menu of best practices.

(1)(a) Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1), for any student who received a score of basic or below basic on the third grade statewide student assessment in English language arts in the previous school year, the school district must implement an intensive reading and literacy improvement strategy from a state menu of best practices established in accordance with subsection (3) of this section or an alternative strategy in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.

(b) Reading and literacy improvement strategies for students with disabilities whose individualized education program includes specially designed instruction in reading or English language arts shall be as provided in the individualized education program.

(2)(a) Also beginning in the 2015-16 school year, in any school where more than forty percent of the tested students received a score of basic or below basic on the third grade statewide student assessment in English language arts in the previous school year, as calculated under this subsection (2), the school district must implement an intensive reading and literacy improvement strategy from a state menu of best practices established in accordance with subsection (3) of this section or an alternative strategy in accordance with subsection (4) of this section for all students in grades kindergarten through four at the school.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection (2), the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall exclude the following from the calculation of a school's percentage of tested students receiving a score of basic or below basic on the third grade statewide student assessment:

(i) Students enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program unless the student has participated in the transitional bilingual instruction program for three school years;

(ii) Students with disabilities whose individualized education program specifies a different standard to measure reading performance than is required for the statewide student assessment; and

(iii) Schools with fewer than ten students in third grade.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene a panel of experts, including the Washington state institute for public policy, to develop a state menu of best practices and strategies for intensive reading and literacy improvement designed to assist struggling students in reaching grade level in reading by the end of fourth grade. The state menu must also include best practices and strategies to improve the reading and literacy of students who are English language learners and for system improvements that schools and school districts can implement to improve reading instruction for all students. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall publish the state menu by July 1, 2014, and update the state menu by each July 1st thereafter.

(4) School districts may use an alternative practice or strategy that is not on a state menu developed under subsection (3) of this section for two school years initially. If the district is able to demonstrate improved outcomes for participating students over the previous two school years at a level commensurate with the best practices and strategies on the state menu, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must approve use of the alternative practice or strategy by the district for one additional school year. Subsequent annual approval by the superintendent of public instruction to use the alternative practice or strategy is dependent on the district continuing to demonstrate an increase in improved outcomes for participating students.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 106.]

NOTES:

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.